Maryland, session 2025, HB0919.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
6–309.
(a) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, this subtitle and the tax credit
authorized under it shall terminate on January 1, [2027] 2026.
6–407.
(A) THIS SUBTITLE AND THE TAX CREDIT AUTHORIZED UNDER IT SHALL
TERMINATE ON JANUARY 1, 2026.

HOUSE BILL 919 3
(B) AFTER THE TERMINATION OF THIS SUBTITLE, TAX CREDITS EARNED
MAY BE CARRIED FORWARD IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 6–403 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
6–1002.
(b) (2) The enhancements offered under the Program shall be applicable to all
taxable years beginning after December 31, 2018, but before January 1, [2027] 2026.
Chapter 515 of the Acts of 2000, as amended by Chapter 98 of the Acts of 2005,
Chapter 20 of the Acts of 2010, Chapter 85 of the Acts of 2019, and Chapter 114 of
the Acts of 2021
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, this Act shall be applicable to all
taxable years beginning after December 31, 1999 but before January 1, [2026] 2025.
(b) If a taxpayer’s taxable year for income tax purposes is not the calendar year:
(1) for the taxable year that ends in calendar year 2000, the taxpayer may
apply for a prorated credit for research and development expenses paid or incurred in the
taxable year for that part of the taxable year that falls in calendar year 2000; and
(2) for the taxable year that begins in calendar year [2025] 2024, the
taxpayer may apply for only a prorated credit for research and development expenses paid
or incurred in the taxable year for that part of the taxable year that falls in calendar year
[2025] 2024.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2000. It shall remain effective for a period of [27] 26 years and, at the end of June 30,
[2027] 2026, with no further action required by the General Assembly, this Act shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Chapter 516 of the Acts of 2000, as amended by Chapter 98 of the Acts of 2005,
Chapter 20 of the Acts of 2010, Chapter 85 of the Acts of 2019, and Chapter 114 of
the Acts of 2021
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, this Act shall be applicable to all
taxable years beginning after December 31, 1999 but before January 1, [2026] 2025.
(b) If a taxpayer’s taxable year for income tax purposes is not the calendar year:

HOUSE BILL 919
(1) for the taxable year that ends in calendar year 2000, the taxpayer may
apply for a prorated credit for research and development expenses paid or incurred in the
taxable year for that part of the taxable year that falls in calendar year 2000; and
(2) for the taxable year that begins in calendar year [2025] 2024, the
taxpayer may apply for only a prorated credit for research and development expenses paid
or incurred in the taxable year for that part of the taxable year that falls in calendar year
[2025] 2024.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2000. It shall remain effective for a period of [27] 26 years and, at the end of June 30,
[2027] 2026, with no further action required by the General Assembly, this Act shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–725.
(c) (3) (ii) The Department may not issue any tax credit certificates under
this section after June 30, [2028] 2025.
10–732.
(b) (1) Subject to the limitations of this section, for a taxable year beginning
after December 31, 2022, but before January 1, [2028] 2026, an individual or a corporation
that employs not more than 500 employees may claim credits against the State income tax
for:
(i) security clearance administrative expenses, not to exceed
$200,000;
(ii) expenses incurred for rental payments owed during the first year
of a rental agreement for spaces leased in the State if the individual or corporation is a
small business that performs security–based contracting, not to exceed $200,000; and
(iii) subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, construction and
equipment costs incurred to construct or renovate a single SCIF in an amount equal to the
lesser of 50% of the costs or $200,000.
10–733.1.
(d) (3) (i) The total amount of the credit certificates approved by the
Secretary of Commerce under this subsection may not exceed:

HOUSE BILL 919 5
1. for taxable year 2018, $2,000,000; and
2. for taxable [year] YEARS 2019 [and each taxable year
thereafter] THROUGH 2025, $4,000,000.
(ii) For each taxable year, the Secretary of Commerce shall award
25% of the amount of tax credits authorized under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph to
qualified buyers that purchase cybersecurity services.
(III) THE SECRETARY OF COMMERCE MAY NOT AWARD TAX
CREDITS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION FOR A TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER
DECEMBER 31, 2025.
10–734.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Administration” means the Motor Vehicle Administration.
(3) “Qualified vehicle” means a Class F (tractor) vehicle described under §
13–923 of the Transportation Article that is titled and registered in the State.
(b) Subject to the limitations of this section, an individual or a corporation
HEADQUARTERED IN THE STATE that obtains a tax credit certificate from the
Administration may claim a credit against the State income tax for the expense of
registering a qualified vehicle in the State during the taxable year.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Tax – General
[9–315.
(a) A licensed dealer or licensed special fuel seller shall deduct 0.5% of the 1st 10
cents of the motor fuel tax on each gallon of motor fuel, as a discount:
(1) instead of an allowance for evaporation, shrinkage, and handling; and
(2) to reimburse the licensed dealer or licensed special fuel seller for
expenses incurred for the State in:
(i) keeping records;
(ii) collecting and paying the tax; and

HOUSE BILL 919
(iii) preparing reports.
(b) (1) This subsection does not apply to:
(i) any aviation gasoline; or
(ii) any other motor fuel on which the motor fuel tax has not been
paid.
(2) From the discount under subsection (a) of this section:
(i) a licensed dealer who sells gasoline to a retail service station
dealer shall deduct on the bill 1/2 of the discount;
(ii) a licensed dealer who sells gasoline to a licensed distributor or
licensed special fuel seller shall deduct on the bill 2/3 of the discount;
(iii) a licensed distributor who sells motor fuel to a retail service
station dealer shall deduct on the bill 1/3 of the discount;
(iv) a licensed special fuel seller who sells special fuel to a retail
service station dealer shall deduct on the bill 1/2 of the discount;
(v) a licensed special fuel seller who sells special fuel to a licensed
distributor shall deduct on the bill 2/3 of the discount; and
(vi) a licensed special fuel seller who sells gasoline to a licensed
distributor shall deduct on the bill 1/3 of the discount.]
11–210.
(a) [The sales and use tax does not apply to a sale of:
(1) machinery or equipment used to produce bituminous concrete; or
(2) electricity, fuel, and other utilities used to operate that machinery or
equipment.
(b)] The sales and use tax does not apply to a sale of:
(1) tangible personal property, a digital code, or a digital product used
directly and predominantly in a production activity at any stage of operation on the
production activity site from the handling of raw material or components to the movement
of the finished product, if the tangible personal property, digital code, or digital product is
not installed so that it becomes real property;

HOUSE BILL 919 7
(2) a melting, smelting, heating, or annealing coke oven, aluminum
furnace, anode bake oven, electrolytic pot, cathode, refractory, or other material used in
relining and rebuilding a furnace or oven; or
(3) a foundation to support other machinery or equipment or an item
required to conform to an air or water pollution law and normally considered part of real
property.
[(c) The sales and use tax does not apply to a sale of equipment that is used by a
retail food vendor to manufacture or process bread or bakery goods for resale if:
(1) the taxable price of each piece of equipment is at least $2,000; and
(2) the retail food vendor operates a substantial grocery or market
business, as defined in § 11–206(a) of this subtitle, at the same location where the food is
sold.
(d) The sales and use tax does not apply to the sale, on or after January 1, 2000,
but before January 1, 2008, of machinery or equipment:
(1) that enables a television or radio station to originate and broadcast or
to receive and broadcast digital signals; and
(2) that was or is purchased to comply with or to facilitate compliance with
the Telecommunications Act of 1996, Pub. L. 104–104, 110 Stat. 56.]
[(e)] (B) The sales and use tax does not apply to the sale of:
(1) machinery or equipment used directly and predominantly to produce
Energy Star windows or Energy Star entry doors for residential real property; or
(2) electricity, fuel, and other utilities used to operate that machinery or
equipment.
[11–214.1.
(a) In this section:
(1) “precious metal bullion or coins” means:
(i) any precious metal that has gone through a refining process and
is in a state or condition such that its value depends on its precious metal content and not
on its form; or
(ii) except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, monetized
bullion, coins, or other forms of money that:

HOUSE BILL 919
1. are manufactured from precious metals; and
2. are or have in the past been used as a medium of exchange
under the laws of the State, the United States, or a foreign nation; and
(2) “precious metal bullion or coins” does not include jewelry or a work of
art made of precious metal bullion or coins.
(b) The sales and use tax does not apply to a sale of precious metal bullion or coins
if the sale price is greater than $1,000.]
[11–232.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) (i) “Construction material” means an item of tangible personal
property that is used to construct or renovate a building, a structure, or an improvement
on land and that typically loses its separate identity as personal property once incorporated
into the real property.
(ii) “Construction material” includes building materials, building
systems equipment, landscaping materials, and supplies.
(3) “Target redevelopment area” means any real property owned or leased
by a person in Baltimore County that:
(i) was previously owned at any time by Bethlehem Steel
Corporation, or any of its subsidiaries; and
(ii) was, as of January 1, 2016, the subject of an approved application
for participation in the Voluntary Cleanup Program under Title 7, Subtitle 5 of the
Environment Article.
(4) “Warehousing equipment” means equipment used for material
handling and storage, including racking systems, conveying systems, and computer
systems and equipment.
(b) The sales and use tax does not apply to a sale of construction material or
warehousing equipment, if:
(1) the material or equipment is purchased by a person solely for use in a
target redevelopment area; and
(2) the buyer provides the vendor with evidence of eligibility for the
exemption issued by the Comptroller.]
12–104.

HOUSE BILL 919 9
(b) The tobacco tax does not apply to:
(3) cigarettes or other tobacco products that:
(i) a consumer brings into the State:
1. if the quantity brought from another state does not exceed
other tobacco products having a retail value of $100 or [5 cartons] 1 CARTON of cigarettes;
or
2. if the quantity brought from a United States armed forces
installation or reservation does not exceed other tobacco products having a retail value of
$100 or [5 cartons] 1 CARTON of cigarettes;
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall be
applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Sections 2 and 3 of this Act
shall take effect July 1, 2025.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in Section
5 of this Act, this Act shall take effect June 1, 2025.